Washington statutes.
RCW 41.45.0604

Contribution rates—Law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2.

(1)(a) Not later than July 31, 2008, and every even-numbered year thereafter, the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 retirement board shall adopt contribution rates for the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 as provided in RCW 41.26.720(1)(a).

(b) For 2021-2023 and 2023-2025 fiscal biennia, contribution rates for the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 may not exceed the rates adopted by the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 retirement board in 2020.

(2) The law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 retirement board shall immediately notify the directors of the office of financial management and department of retirement systems of the state, employer, and employee rates adopted. Thereafter, the director shall collect those rates adopted by the board. The rates shall be effective for the ensuing biennial period, subject to any legislative modifications.

[ 2022 c 125 s 6; 2007 c 280 s 3; 2003 c 92 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2003 c 92: See RCW 41.26.906.